Illinois, session 104th, SB1942.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Stop 5Abusive Website Access Litigation Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Access violation" means any allegation that a public 8accommodation does not provide sufficient access under the 9federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.10    "Public accommodation" has the meaning given to that term 11in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990. "Public 12accommodation" includes a website operated by a resident of 13this State.14    "Resident" means any resident of the State. 15    Section 10. Litigation by the Attorney General.16    (a) The Attorney General, on behalf of a class of 17residents, that is subject to litigation that alleges any 18website access violation and any resident of this State that 19is subject to litigation that alleges any website access 20violation may file a civil action in any court in this State 21against the party, attorney, or law firm that initiated such 22litigation for a determination as to whether such litigation   SB1942- 2 -LRB104 11058 JRC 21140 b1alleging a website access violation is abusive litigation.2    In determining whether any litigation that alleges a 3website access violation constitutes abusive litigation, the 4trier of fact shall consider the totality of the circumstances 5to determine if the primary purpose of the litigation is 6obtaining a payment from a defendant because of the expense of 7defending the action in court. For the purposes of making this 8determination, the trier of fact may assess the following 9factors and any other factors the trier of fact deems 10relevant:11        (1) the number of substantially similar actions filed 12    by the same plaintiff, lawyer, or law firm or the history 13    of such plaintiff, lawyer, or law firm in bringing 14    frivolous litigation or other litigation declared by a 15    court to be abusive litigation in the past 10 years;16        (2) was there a good-faith attempt by the litigant to 17    offer the small business time to resolve the issue before 18    filing litigation;19        (3) the number of full-time employees employed by the 20    defendant and the resources available to the defendant to 21    engage in the litigation;22        (4) the resources available to the defendant to 23    correct the alleged website-access violation;24        (5) whether the jurisdiction or venue where the action 25    is brought is a substantial obstacle to defending against 26    the litigation; and  SB1942- 3 -LRB104 11058 JRC 21140 b1        (6) whether the filing party or lawyer filing the 2    litigation is a resident of this State or is licensed to 3    practice law in this State.4    (b) Except as provided further, if the defendant in the 5litigation that alleges a website access violation in good 6faith attempts to cure the alleged violation within 90 days 7after being provided written notice or being served a petition 8or complaint with sufficient detail to identify and correct 9the alleged violation, there shall be a rebuttable presumption 10that the subsequent initiation or continuance of litigation 11that alleges a website access violation constitutes abusive 12litigation.13    (c) There shall not be a rebuttable presumption that such 14litigation is abusive litigation if the alleged website access 15violation is not corrected, as determined by the court, within 16180 days after being provided written notice or being served a 17petition or complaint with sufficient detail to identify and 18correct the alleged violation. The trier of fact may not 19determine whether such litigation is abusive litigation until 20after the 180-day period expires or the alleged violation is 21corrected, as determined by the court, whichever occurs first.22    (d) If the Attorney General determines that the litigation 23alleging a website access violation is not abusive, there 24shall be a rebuttable presumption that such litigation is not 25abusive.26    (e) At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a website   SB1942- 4 -LRB104 11058 JRC 21140 b1access violation, if the court determines that the litigation 2is abusive, it may award to the defendant attorney's fees and 3costs as appropriate under the Code of Civil Procedure and 4Supreme Court Rules. The court may also award to the defendant 5punitive damages not to exceed 3 times the amount of 6attorney's fees awarded to the defendant.